Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) The legislature declares the failure of the Fairfax bridge and its permanent closure on April 22, 2025, created an emergency that requires immediate attention.(2) The department is directed to restore access via state route number 165 across the Carbon river as soon as possible.(3) The secretary is granted emergency authority to expedite the process of planning and construction of the replacement of the Fairfax bridge on state route number 165 that includes the ability to waive or suspend statutory obligations or limitations in the following areas:(a) Liability for participation in interlocal agreements;(b) Inspection fees owed to the department of labor and industries;(c) Regulations, tariffs, and notice requirements under the jurisdiction of the utilities and transportation commission;(d) Application of tax due dates and penalties relating to collection of taxes; and(e) Such other statutory and regulatory obligations or limitations prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders, rules, or regulations of any state agency if strict compliance with the provision of any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency, unless (i) the waiver or suspension would conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, or (ii) the waiver or suspension would conflict with the rights, under the First Amendment, of freedom of speech or of the people to peaceably assemble.(4) The secretary shall give as much notice as practical to the governor, legislative leadership of the transportation committees, and impacted local governments when issuing orders under this section.(5) Activities and projects performed to implement this section are not subject to any of the provisions of Executive Order 25-07.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---